Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202646-297
Permit to appropriate water; modification to include underground water storage; procedure.

Any person who has an approved, unperfected appropriation pursuant to Chapter 46, article 2, may apply to the Chief Water Officer for a modification of such permit to include intentional underground water storage associated with the appropriation. The application shall be made on a form prescribed and furnished by the Chief Water Officer without cost to the applicant. Upon receipt of such an application, the Chief Water Officer shall proceed in accordance with rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the Chief Water Officer, subject to section 46-226.02.

Laws 1983, LB 198, § 11;

Laws 1997, LB 752, § 120;

Laws 2013, LB102, § 1;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 119.